Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1016.1 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The execution of the judgment in all cases where a sentence
of death has been imposed is hereby stayed until further act of the
Legislature.
B. The Court of Criminal Appeals shall not order execution of
the judgment in cases where a sentence of death has been imposed.

Req. No. 10081 Page 1

C. No further execution dates shall be set by the Court of
Criminal Appeals or by the Governor of Oklahoma.
D. All execution dates currently in place at the time of the
effective date of this act shall be vacated.
E. All statutes governing the execution of the penalty of death
in this state are hereby suspended. Upon repeal of this act by the
Legislature, any such statute that has not otherwise been repealed
shall return to full force and effect.
F. The provisions of this act shall not be construed to vacate
the individual judgments in cases where a sentence of death has been
imposed.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10081 GRS 12/30/24







Req. No. 10081 Page 2